Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-447
Petition for new trial.

At any time within one year after approval by the convening authority of a court-martial sentence, the accused may petition the State Judge Advocate for a new trial on the ground of newly discovered evidence or fraud on the court. The State Judge Advocate shall refer the petition to the court-martial which last heard the case which shall review the petition and the record and report to the convening authority its recommendation for grant or denial of new trial. If a new trial is recommended, the convening authority shall order a rehearing as provided in section 55-438. Upon filing of the petition for new trial, any proceedings pending upon appeal or review of sentence shall be dismissed.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 47, p. 1573.